Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,299
Environmental Safety Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Environmental Safety Cash Fund which shall be used to pay the expenses of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment related to issuance and renewal of licenses and permits and annual inspections, including sections 81-15,268, 81-15,272, 81-15,282, and 81-15,292. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The State Treasurer shall transfer any money in the Health and Human Services Cash Fund pursuant to sections 81-15,268, 81-15,272, 81-15,282, and 81-15,292, as such sections existed prior to July 1, 2021, to the Environmental Safety Cash Fund on July 1, 2021.

Laws 2021, LB148, § 83;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 445.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.